Illinois, session 104th, HB1326.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Section 15-177.1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-177.1 new)7    Sec. 15-177.1. The 5-year property homestead exemption.8    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for 9taxable year 2026 and each taxable year thereafter, in Cook 10County, the aggregate amount of property taxes levied against 11any parcel of qualified homestead property in any taxable year 12may not exceed $5,000. The property taxes collected for the 13qualified homestead property shall be distributed to the 14taxing districts in which the property is located according to 15each taxing district's proportionate share of the qualified 16homestead property's aggregate liability. 17    (b) To receive the exemption under this Section, the 18qualified taxpayer must submit an application to the county 19assessor during the application period specified by the county 20assessor. The applications shall be clearly marked as 21applications for the 5-year property homestead exemption. The 22county assessor shall annually give notice of the application 23period by mail or by publication. The assessor or chief county   HB1326- 2 -LRB104 06554 HLH 16590 b1assessment officer may determine the eligibility of 2residential property to receive the homestead exemption 3provided by this Section by application, visual inspection, 4questionnaire, or other reasonable methods. Each year, the 5county assessor shall compile a list of properties that have 6been granted a homestead exemption under this Section and 7shall provide that list to the State Treasurer and to the 8corporate authorities of each taxing district located within 9the county. 10    (c) As used in this Section: 11    "Qualified homestead property" means real property located 12in Cook County that has been granted an exemption under this 13Section and that, as of January 1 of the tax year:14        (1) is residential property that is owned and occupied 15    by a qualified taxpayer as the qualified taxpayer's 16    principal residence and domicile; or17        (2) contains a single family residence that is 18    occupied as a principal residence and domicile by a 19    qualified taxpayer who has a legal or equitable interest 20    in the property as a lessee, as evidenced by a written 21    instrument, and on which the qualified taxpayer is liable 22    for the payment of property taxes.23    "Qualified taxpayer" means an individual who, for at least 245 continuous years as of January 1 of the taxable year, has 25occupied the same homestead property as a principal residence 26and domicile.   HB1326- 3 -LRB104 06554 HLH 16590 b1    (d) Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 8 of the State Mandates 2Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for the 3implementation of any mandate created by this Section.  4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.